Tennessee, session 114, HB1648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-4-110(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The summary report must be made available to the public through publication on the
website of the comptroller of the treasury.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1648
010854
- 1 -